Missouri, session 2026, HB3507.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 8, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
2 known as section 8.978, to read as follows:
8.978. All on-site construction labor for public works contracts and public
2 construction shall be employees of the entity working under the state contract. No
3 entity shall utilize independent contractors as laborers, mechanics, operators, or other
4 trades for a state contract.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.